District of Columbia statutes.
1-204.105

Approval of measure.

If a majority of the registered qualified electors voting in a referendum approve an act or adopt legislation by initiative, then the adopted initiative or the act approved by referendum shall be an act of the Council upon the certification of the vote on such initiative or act by the District of Columbia Board of Elections and Ethics, and such act shall become law subject to the provisions of § 1-206.02(c).

Mar. 10, 1978, D.C. Law 2-46, § 2, 24 DCR 199
Oct. 27, 1978, 92 Stat. 2023, Pub. L. 95-526
1973 Ed., § 1-185.
1981 Ed., § 1-285.